Nevada, session 83, AB323.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 393.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
393.080 1. The board of trustees of a school district may:
(a) Build, purchase or rent schoolhouses and other school
buildings, including, but not limited to, teacherages, gymnasiums
and stadiums, and dormitories and dining halls as provided in
NRS 393.090.
(b) Enter into lease agreements for school facilities with an
option to purchase the facilities.
(c) Change the location of schools.
(d) [Close] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, close
a school or change the use of the school building to a purpose other
than the teaching of [kindergarten] prekindergarten through 12th
grade.
(e) Supervise and inspect the work performed pursuant to a
contract to which the provisions of NRS 393.110 apply.
2. Any board of trustees which proposes to change the location
of a school, close a school or change the use of a school building as
provided in subsection 1 shall [give] :
(a) Give 30 days’ written notice to the [principal] :
(1) Principal and teachers of the affected school [and to the
parents] ;
(2) Parents of the children attending that school [. In
addition the board of trustees shall publish] ; and
(3) Members of the community who reside within a 1 mile
radius of that school; and
(b) Publish a notice of the subject, time and place of the
meeting at which the matter will be considered, in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county at least 10 days before the meeting.
3. The written notice of a proposal to close a school must
include, without limitation:
(a) The reason for the proposal to close the school;
(b) Any documentation of costs associated with the closure of
the school; and
-
*AB323*

– 3 –
(c) The scope of work which would be necessary for the school
to remain open.
4. The board of trustees shall not base a decision to close a
school pursuant to this section on:
(a) Any damage or other impact to the school caused by a
flood or fire; or
(b) The number of pupils enrolled in the school.
Sec. 2. NRS 393.085 is hereby amended to read as follows:
393.085 1. Any resident of a school district who is aggrieved
by a decision of the board of trustees to close or change the use of a
school under NRS 393.080 may, within 30 days after the decision is
rendered, make a written request to the board for a hearing for
reconsideration of the decision. The board shall schedule the hearing
within 30 days after receiving the request and shall publish a notice
of the time and place of the hearing in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county at least 10 days before the hearing. If no
written request for a hearing for reconsideration is filed within the
time prescribed in this subsection, the decision of the board of
trustees becomes final for the purpose of review by the State Board
pursuant to subsection 3.
2. Upon a hearing for reconsideration, the board of trustees
may affirm, modify or reverse the decision. If, after a hearing for
reconsideration, the board of trustees takes no action relating to or
reverses the decision to close or change the use of a school, the
school must remain open. The decision of the board of trustees
after its reconsideration hearing is [a] final [decision subject to
judicial] for the purpose of:
(a) Review by the State Board pursuant to subsection 3, if the
decision is to close or change the use of the school; or
(b) Judicial review as provided by law [.] , if the decision is to
allow the school to remain open.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if the
decision of the board of trustees to close or change the use of a
school becomes final pursuant to subsection 1 or 2, the State
Board shall review the decision at its next regular meeting after
the decision becomes final pursuant to subsection 1 or 2, as
applicable. If such a decision becomes final within 10 business
days before the next regular meeting of the State Board, the State
Board shall delay the review until the next following regular
meeting.
4. After a review is completed pursuant to subsection 3, the
State Board may affirm, modify or reverse the decision of the
board of trustees. If the State Board takes no action relating to or
reverses the decision to close or change the use of a school, the
school must remain open.
-
*AB323*

– 4 –
5. A decision by the State Board after a review is completed
pursuant to subsection 3 is final for the purpose of judicial review
as provided by law.
Sec. 3. The amendatory provisions of this act do not apply to
any decision of the board of trustees of a school district pursuant to
NRS 393.080 or 393.085 that became final before July 1, 2025.
Sec. 4. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB323*